Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE J. WATER IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 9303. EL PASO COUNTY WATER

IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT NO. 1

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 9303.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a board member.

(3) "District" means the El Paso County Water Improvement District No. 1.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 19 (S.B. 832), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 581 (S.B. 856), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER B. ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS

Sec. 9303.051. VOTER ELIGIBILITY. (a) An individual is eligible to vote in a district election only if the individual:

(1) is 18 years of age or older;

(2) is a United States citizen;

(3) holds title to or an interest in title to irrigable land within the boundaries of the district; and

(4) receives and uses irrigation water delivered by the district through the district's canal system.

(b) To vote in a district election, an individual eligible to vote under Subsection (a) must register with the district not later than the 30th day before the date on which the district election is held.

(c) The district shall file with the county clerk of El Paso County a certified copy of the list of the district's registered voters not later than the 25th day before the date on which a district election is held.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 19 (S.B. 832), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 9303.052. DISTRICT PUBLICATION OF NOTICE CONCERNING VOTER ELIGIBILITY AND REGISTRATION. Not later than the 60th day and not earlier than the 90th day before the date of each district election, the district shall publish notice of the voter eligibility and registration requirements provided by Section 9303.051.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 19 (S.B. 832), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 9303.053. ADMINISTRATION OF ELECTIONS. (a) The district shall contract with the elections administrator of El Paso County to conduct an election held by the district.

(b) The district shall pay the costs of an election conducted under Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 581 (S.B. 856), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 9303.054. PUBLIC INFORMATION. (a) The district shall maintain an Internet website.

(b) The board shall make available on the district's Internet website:

(1) campaign finance reports for each director;

(2) the meeting agenda and minutes for each open meeting held by the board;

(3) archived video and audio for each open meeting held by the board;

(4) the district's budget for the current year; and

(5) any audits of the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 581 (S.B. 856), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.